North Carolina statutes. Chapter 87. Contractors.
Article 4. Electrical Contractors.
§ 87-48.
Penalty for violation of Article; powers of Board to enjoin violation.

Any person, partnership, firm, or corporation that violates any of the provisions of this Article or that engages or offers to engage in the business of installing, maintaining, altering, or repairing within North Carolina any electric wiring, devices, appliances, or equipment without first having obtained a license under the provisions of this Article is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

Whenever it shall appear to the State Board of Examiners of Electrical Contractors that any person, partnership, firm or corporation has violated, is violating, or threatens to violate any provisions of this Article, the Board may apply to the courts of the State for a restraining order and injunction to restrain such practices. If upon such application the court finds that any provision of this Article is being violated, or a violation thereof is threatened, the court shall issue an order restraining and enjoining such violations, and such relief may be granted regardless of whether criminal prosecution is instituted under the provisions of this Article. The venue for actions brought under this subsection shall be the superior court of any county in which such acts are alleged to have been committed or in the county where the defendants in such action reside.

History.

1937, c. 87, s. 13; 1969, c. 669, s. 1; 1979, c. 904, s. 14; 1989, c. 709, s. 10; 1993, c. 539, s. 606; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2021-84, s. 5.

§ 87-49.
No examination required of licensed contractors.

Any person, firm or corporation licensed in this State as a Class II electrical contractor on the effective date of this Article shall be entitled to be licensed, without examination, in the limited classification upon payment of the required fee and may be licensed in the intermediate or in the unlimited classification without written examination upon satisfactory proof to the Board that such applicant is in fact qualified for such classification. Any person, firm or corporation licensed in this State as a Class I electrical contractor on the effective date of this Article shall be entitled to be licensed without examination in the limited, intermediate or unlimited classification upon payment of the required fee. Provided, that any person who has been once duly licensed by the Board, whose license has expired solely because of failure to apply for renewal, may apply and have a license issued under the provisions of this section if within a period of 12 months preceding such issuance the applicant shall have been primarily actively engaged as an electrical contractor or in an occupation which in the judgment of the Board is similar or equivalent to that of an electrical contractor.

History.

1969, c. 669, s. 1.

§ 87-50.
Reciprocity.

To the extent that other states which provide for the licensing of electrical contractors provide for similar action, the Board may grant licenses of the same or equivalent classification to electrical contractors licensed by other states without written examination upon satisfactory proof furnished to the Board that the qualifications of such applicants are equal to the qualifications of holders of similar licenses in North Carolina and upon payment of the required fee.

History.

1969, c. 669, s. 1.

§ 87-50.1.
Public awareness program.

The Board shall establish and implement a public awareness program to inform the general public of the purpose and function of the Board.

History.

1979, c. 904, s. 13.

§ 87-51.
Severability of provisions.

If any provision of this Article or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is for any reason held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the Article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Article are declared to be severable.

History.

1969, c. 669, s. 1.